Idaho statutes. Title 23 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
Chapter 9 RETAIL SALE OF LIQUOR BY THE DRINK
§ 23-908. Form of license — Authority — Expiration — Limitations.

Every license issued under the provisions of this chapter shall set forth the name of the person to whom issued, the location by street and number, or other definite designation, of the premises, and such other information as the director shall deem necessary. If issued to a partnership, the names of the persons constituting such partnership shall be set forth in the application. If issued to a corporation or association, the names of the principal officers and the governing board shall be set forth in the application. Such license shall be signed by the licensee and prominently displayed in the place of business at all times. Every license issued under the provisions of this chapter is separate and distinct and no person except the licensee therein named except as herein otherwise provided, shall exercise any of the privileges granted thereunder. All licenses shall expire at 1:00 o’clock a.m. on the first day of the renewal month which shall be determined by the director by administrative rule and shall be subject to annual renewal upon proper application. The director will determine the renewal month by county based on the number of current licenses within each county, distributing renewals throughout the licensing year. The director may adjust the renewal month to accommodate population increases. Each licensee will be issued a temporary license to operate until their renewal month has been determined. Thereafter, renewals will occur annually on their renewal month. Renewal applications for liquor by the drink licenses accompanied by the required fee must be filed with the director on or before the first day of the designated renewal month. Any licensee holding a valid license who fails to file an application for renewal of his current license on or before the first day of the designated renewal month shall have a grace period of an additional thirty-one (31) days in which to file an application for renewal of the license. The licensee shall not be permitted to sell and dispense liquor by the drink at retail during the thirty-one (31) day extended time period unless and until the license is renewed. In any city of less than sixteen thousand (16,000) population, as established in the last preceding census or any subsequent special census conducted by the United States bureau of the census, no person shall be granted more than one (1) license in any city for any one (1) year; and no partnership, association or corporation in such city of less than sixteen thousand (16,000) population holding a license under the provisions of this chapter shall have as a member, officer or stockholder any person who has any financial interest of any kind in, or is a member of, another partnership or association or an officer of another corporation holding a license in the same city for the same year; provided that this section shall not prevent any person, firm or corporation, owning two (2) or more buildings on connected property in a city from making application for and receiving licenses permitting the sale of liquor by the drink in such building.

An application to transfer any license issued pursuant to chapter 9, title 23, Idaho Code, shall be made to the director. Upon receipt of such an application, the director shall make the same investigation and determinations with respect to the transferee as are required by section 23-907, Idaho Code, and if the director shall determine that all of the conditions required of a licensee under chapter 9, title 23, Idaho Code, have been met by the proposed transferee, then the license shall be indorsed over to the proposed transferee by said licensee for the remainder of the period for which such license has been issued and the director shall issue a license to the transferee.

The director, in his discretion, may deny the transfer of a license during the pendancy [pendency] of any proceedings for suspension or revocation which were instituted pursuant to the terms of this chapter.

Each new license issued on or after July 1, 1980, shall be placed into actual use by the original licensee at the time of issuance and remain in use for at least six (6) consecutive months or be forfeited to the state and be eligible for issue to another person by the director after compliance with the provisions of section 23-907, Idaho Code. Such license shall not be transferable for a period of two (2) years from the date of original issuance, except as provided by subsection (5)(a), (b), (c), (d) or (e) of this section.

The fee for transferring a liquor license shall be ten percent (10%) of the purchase price of the liquor license or the cost of good will, whichever is greater; except no fee shall be collected in the following events:

The transfer of a license between husband and wife in the event of a property division; or

The transfer of a license to a receiver, trustee in bankruptcy or similar person or officer; or

The transfer of a license to the heirs or personal representative of the estate in the event of the death of the licensee; or

The transfer of a license arising out of the dissolution of a partnership where the license is transferred to one (1) or more of the partners; or

The transfer of a license within a family whether an individual, partnership or corporation.

The fee for transferring a liquor license for other than a sale shall be fifty percent (50%) of the per annum license fee set forth in section 23-904, Idaho Code; except no fee shall be collected for transfers as outlined in subsection (5)(a), (b), (c), (d) or (e) of this section.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 8, p. 870; am. 1949, ch. 276, § 2, p. 565; am. 1959, ch. 118, § 3, p. 254; am. 1967, ch. 143, § 2, p. 326; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 23, p. 811; am. 1977, ch. 143, § 1, p. 316; am. 1978, ch. 353, § 1, p. 936; am. 1980, ch. 313, § 2, p. 802; am. 1981, ch. 75, § 1, p. 106; am. 1991, ch. 28, § 1, p. 54; am. 1991, ch. 283, § 1, p. 729; am. 2001, ch. 30, § 1, p. 43.

§ 23-909. Bond. [Repealed.]

§ 23-910. Persons not qualified to be licensed.

No license shall be issued to:

Any person, or any one (1) of its members, officers, or governing board, who has, within three (3) years prior to the date of making application, been convicted of any violation of the laws of the United States, the state of Idaho, or any other state of the United States, or of the resolutions or ordinances of any county or city of this state, relating to the importation, transportation, manufacture or sale of alcoholic liquor or beer; or who has been convicted of, paid any fine, been placed on probation, received a deferred sentence, received a withheld judgment or completed any sentence of confinement for any felony within five (5) years prior to the date of making application for any license.

A person who is engaged in the operation, or interested therein, of any house or place for the purpose of prostitution or who has been convicted of any crime or misdemeanor opposed to decency and morality.

A person whose license issued under this act has been revoked; an individual who was a member of a partnership or association which was a licensee under this act and whose license has been revoked; an individual who was an officer, member of the governing board or one (1) of the ten (10) principal stockholders of a corporation which was a licensee under this act and whose license has been revoked; a partnership or association one (1) of whose members was a licensee under this act and whose license was revoked; a corporation one (1) of whose officers, member of the governing board or ten (10) principal stockholders was a licensee under the provisions of this act and whose license has been revoked; an association or partnership, one (1) of whose members was a member of a partnership or association licensed under the provisions of this act and whose license has been revoked; a partnership or association, one (1) of whose members was an officer, a member of the governing board, or one (1) of the ten (10) principal stockholders of a corporation licensed under the provisions of this act and whose license has been revoked; a corporation, one (1) of whose officers, member of the governing board, or ten (10) principal stockholders was a member of a partnership or association licensed under the provisions of this act and whose license was revoked; a corporation, one (1) of whose officers, member of the governing board, or ten (10) principal stockholders was an officer, member of the governing board, or one (1) of the ten (10) principal stockholders of a corporation licensed under the provisions of this act and whose license was revoked.

Any officer, agent, or employee of any distillery, winery, brewery, or any wholesaler, or jobber, of liquor or malt beverages except as provided in section 23-912, Idaho Code. This prohibition shall not apply to officers, agents, or employees of any winery operating a golf course on the same premises as the winery.

A person who does not hold a retail beer license issued under the laws of the state of Idaho.

Any license, held by any licensee disqualified under the provisions of this section from being issued a license, shall forthwith be revoked by the director.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 10, p. 870; am. 1957, ch. 124, § 1, p. 205; am. 1961, ch. 28, § 1, p. 37; am. 1963, ch. 423, § 3, p. 1098; am. 1969, ch. 406, § 1, p. 1126; am. 1991, ch. 179, § 1, p. 442; am. 1992, ch. 315, § 1, p. 937; am. 1994, ch. 14, § 5, p. 20; am. 1996, ch. 349, § 2, p. 1167; am. 1999, ch. 141, § 1, p. 403.

§ 23-911. Restrictions on manufacturers, transporters or distillers.

Except as provided in section 23-912, Idaho Code, no manufacturer, rectifier, wholesaler, stockholder, shareholder, partner, or the owner of any other interest in any corporations, association or partnership financially interested in the manufacture, transportation or sale of liquor shall furnish, give, rent, lend or sell any equipment or fixtures directly or indirectly, or through a subsidiary or affiliate or by any officer, director, or firm member of the industry or otherwise furnish financial aid to any person engaged in the sale of liquor hereunder and no licensee hereunder shall receive or be the beneficiary of any of the benefits hereby prohibited.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 11, p. 870; am. 1973, ch. 75, § 1, p. 121; am. 1999, ch. 141, § 2, p. 403.

§ 23-912. Restrictions of persons interested in premises.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no manufacturer, rectifier, wholesaler, stockholder, shareholder, partner or the owner of any other interest in any corporation, association or partnership financially interested in the manufacture, transportation (except public carriers) or sale of liquor shall hold any interest in any premise licensed hereunder for the sale of liquor or receive any rental or remuneration from any such premise.

A manufacturer, rectifier, wholesaler, stockholder, shareholder, partner or the owner of any interest in any corporation, association or partnership financially interested in the manufacture, transportation or sale of liquor may hold interest in a licensed premises if the licensed premises serves food cooked on the site of the licensed premises, and the person or entity can show through recordkeeping that no more than fifty percent (50%) of the gross revenue to the licensed premises is derived from the sale of alcoholic beverages on-site. The owner of the licensed premises pursuant to this subsection shall comply with and be subject to all other rules, regulations or other provisions of law which apply to manufacturers, rectifiers, wholesalers, stockholders, shareholders, partners or the owners of any interest in any corporation, association or partnership financially interested in the manufacture, transportation or sale of liquor save and except as such rules, regulations or laws may restrict such sales at the licensed premises. The holder of a license pursuant to this section shall not be disqualified from holding a beer license, a retail wine license or wine by the drink license for the sale of beer or wine at the licensed premises on the grounds that the licensee is also a manufacturer, wholesaler, stockholder, shareholder, partner or the owner of any interest in any corporation, association or partnership financially interested in the manufacture, transportation or sale of liquor, beer or wine. This subsection shall not be deemed to grant a license for the retail sale of liquor by the drink and the license must be obtained through normal lawful means.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 12, p. 870; am. 1999, ch. 141, § 3, p. 403.

§ 23-913. Licensee not allowed near churches or schools — Exceptions.

No license shall be issued for any premises in any neighborhood which is predominantly residential or within 300 feet of any public school, church, or any other place of worship, measured in a straight line to the nearest entrance to the licensed premises, except with the approval of the governing body of the municipality; provided, that this limitation shall not apply to any duly licensed premises that at the time of licensing did not come within the restricted area but subsequent to licensing same [came] therein.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 13, p. 870.

§ 23-914. Licensee must purchase from division — Price.

All liquor sold by any licensee shall be purchased from the division through its regular retail stores and distributing stations at the posted price thereof. The division is hereby authorized and directed to make such sales pursuant to section 23-309, Idaho Code, upon a special permit issued to such licensee in such form as shall be prescribed by the director of the division. The posted price as used herein shall mean the retail price of such liquor as fixed and determined by the division.

It shall be unlawful for any licensee to sell, or keep for sale, or have on his premises for any purpose whatsoever, any liquor except that purchased as herein authorized and provided, and any licensee found in possession of, selling or keeping for sale any liquor not purchased as herein authorized shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than five (5) years, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Any license issued to such person shall be immediately and permanently revoked. The amount of liquor to be sold to licensees hereunder in any city or village shall be determined by the director or other executive officer of the division, but such sales shall be regulated so as to maintain adequate stocks of merchandise for sale to persons other than said licensees.

The provisions of this section notwithstanding, railroad companies shall have the right to have in their possession liquors other than those purchased from the division.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 14, p. 870; am. 1949, ch. 277, § 2, p. 567; am. 1988, ch. 216, § 2, p. 410; am. 2009, ch. 23, § 53, p. 53; am. 2012, ch. 113, § 18, p. 311.

§ 23-915. Officers may seize illegal liquor.

The director, or any of his agents, any sheriff, constable, or other police officer who shall find any liquor kept or held by any person in violation of the provisions of this act may forthwith seize and remove the same and keep the same as evidence and upon conviction of the person for violation of the provisions hereof, the said liquor, and all packages or receptacles containing the same, shall be forfeited to the state of Idaho and in addition the person so violating this act shall be subject to the other penalties herein prescribed.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 15, p. 870; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 25, p. 811.

§ 23-916. County and city licenses.

In addition to the licensing and control herein provided for the retail sale of liquor by the drink, each county and incorporated city in the state of Idaho is hereby authorized and empowered to license the sale of liquor by the drink at retail within the corporate limits of such city. The respective local authorities may impose and collect license fees for the use and benefit of such city not to exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the amount of the license fee collected by the director as herein provided and for the use and benefit of such county not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount of the license fee collected by the director as herein provided. The governing authority of such city may provide further regulations for the control of such business, and the board of county commissioners of any county may fix the fee for, and may regulate and control the use of, any license issued for the sale of liquor by the drink at retail in any licensed premises not situate within the incorporated limits of any city, not in conflict with the provisions of this act.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 16, p. 870; am. 1957, ch. 151, § 3, p. 250; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 26, p. 811.

§ 23-917. Referendum — Local option.

No license shall be issued hereunder until on or after July 1, 1947. Within sixty (60) days after the effective date of this chapter a petition in writing signed by not less than twenty percent (20%) of the registered, qualified electors of any city may be filed with the clerk of said city as their protest against the issuance of any license in said city under the provisions of this chapter. In the event said petition is presented, the governing body of any such city shall, within five (5) days after the presentation of said petition, meet and determine the sufficiency thereof by ascertaining whether said petition is signed by the required number of registered, qualified electors of the city affected. In the event the governing body of said city determines that said petition is signed by the required percentage of registered, qualified electors, said city governing body shall forthwith make an order calling an election to be held within said city, subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, in accordance with the provisions of title 34, Idaho Code, which shall apply to the holding of the election provided for in this section, except where specifically modified herein. In addition to the other requirements of law, the notice of election shall notify the electors of the issue to be voted upon at said election.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 17, p. 870; am. 1995, ch. 118, § 12, p. 417; am. 2009, ch. 341, § 7, p. 993.

§ 23-918. Form of ballot.

The county clerk must furnish the ballots to be used in such election, which ballots must contain the following words:

“Sale of liquor by the drink, Yes,”

“Sale of liquor by the drink, No,”

and the elector in order to vote must indicate the elector’s choice opposite one (1) of the questions in a space provided therefor.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 18, p. 870; am. 2009, ch. 341, § 8, p. 993.

§ 23-919. Effect of election — Liquor store sales not affected.

Upon a canvass of the votes cast, the county board of canvassers shall certify the result to the city who shall report the results to the director. If a majority of the votes cast are “Sale of liquor by the drink, Yes,” licenses shall be issued in said city as in this chapter provided. If a majority of the votes cast are “Sale of liquor by the drink, No,” then no licenses shall be issued in said city unless thereafter authorized by a subsequent election in said city; provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall be construed to prevent or prohibit the sale of liquor at or by a state liquor store or state distributor.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 19, p. 870; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 27, p. 811; am. 2009, ch. 341, § 9, p. 993.

§ 23-920. Subsequent elections.

A similar election may be subsequently called and held upon the issue of whether the sale of liquor by the drink shall be prohibited or, if prohibited, then an election to determine whether the sale of liquor by the drink shall be licensed. Such subsequent election shall be held upon the filing of a petition, as provided in section 23-917, signed by the requisite percentage of qualified electors. No such subsequent election shall be held prior to November 1, 1949, or oftener than two (2) years after the holding of any such subsequent election.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 20, p. 870.

§ 23-921. No retail sale except by the drink.

It shall be unlawful for any licensee to sell, keep for sale, dispense, give away, or otherwise dispose of any liquor in the original containers or otherwise than by retail sale by the drink.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 21, p. 870.

§ 23-922, 23-922A. Bartenders — Permits — Qualifications — Penalty — Display of permit to peace officer. [Repealed.]

§ 23-923. Bartenders

Bonds. [Repealed.]

§ 23-924, 23-925. Bartenders — Renewal and revocation of permit — Unlawful employment. [Repealed.]

§ 23-925a. Railroad companies

Exception. [Repealed.]

§ 23-926. Destruction of stamps — Sanitary requirements.

It shall be the duty of any licensee hereunder immediately upon emptying any liquor container to deface, so that the same may not again be used, all government or state stamps or labels. Any licensed premises shall be maintained in sanitary condition according to the requirements of chapter 16, title 39, Idaho Code, and any city ordinances pertaining thereto.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 24, p. 870; am. 1974, ch. 247, § 1, p. 1624.

§ 23-927. Hours of sale of liquor.

No liquor shall be sold, offered for sale, or given away upon any licensed premises, and all liquor not in sealed bottles must be locked in a separate room or cabinet during the following hours:

a. Sunday, Memorial Day, Thanksgiving and Christmas from 1 o’clock A.M., to 10 o’clock A.M. the following day; provided however, that on any Sunday not otherwise being a prescribed holiday, it shall be lawful for a licensee having banquet area or meeting room facilities, separate and apart from the usual dispensing area (bar room) and separate and apart from a normal public dining room unless such dining room is closed to the public, to therein dispense liquor between the hours of 2 o’clock P.M. and 11 o’clock P.M. to bona fide participants of banquets, receptions or conventions for consumption only within the confines of such banquet area or meeting room facility.

b. On any other day between 1 o’clock A.M. and 10 o’clock A.M.

c. When any city or county has any ordinance further limiting the hours of sale of liquor, by the drink, then such hours shall be fixed by such ordinance.

A county or city may, however, by ordinance, allow the sale of liquor by the drink on a Sunday, Memorial Day and Thanksgiving, and may also extend until 2 o’clock A.M. the hours of the sale of liquor by the drink.

Any patron present on the licensed premises after the sale of liquor has stopped as provided in subsection (1) and subsection (2) above shall have a reasonable time, not to exceed thirty (30) minutes, to consume any beverages already served.

Any person who consumes or intentionally permits the consumption of any alcoholic beverage upon licensed premises after the time provided for in subsection (3) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

It shall be the duty of every person who is employed at or upon a licensed premises or who owns or manages a licensed premises and is present upon the licensed premises during the hours and at the time set forth in subsection (1) and subsection (2) of this section to lock up and keep locked up in a locked room or locked cabinet all unsealed containers of liquor during the hours and at the times set forth in subsection (1) and subsection (2) of this section, and any such person who fails to perform the duty provided herein shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 25, p. 870; am. 1971, ch. 95, § 1, p. 207; am. 1977, ch. 143, § 3, p. 316; am. 1986, ch. 223, § 1, p. 609; am. 1987, ch. 110, § 1, p. 222; am. 1989, ch. 64, § 8, p. 101; am. 2003, ch. 284, § 1, p. 769; am. 2008, ch. 248, § 2, p. 729.

§ 23-928. Sale away from licensed premises prohibited — Gambling prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any licensee to sell, give away, dispense, vend, or deliver any liquor in any fashion or by means or device, except upon the licensed premises.

It shall be unlawful for any licensee granted a license under the authority of title 23, Idaho Code, to permit, conduct, play, carry on, open or cause to be opened any gaming in or upon the licensed premises or in or upon any premises directly connected by a door, hallway, or other means of access from the licensed premises. Any licensee authorized under the authority of this title and who is also authorized by other Idaho law to conduct the lawful activities of lottery, bingo, raffles, and pari-mutuel betting on the licensed premises shall be exempt from the provisions of this subsection as long as the lawful activities are conducted in conformity with statute and rules promulgated pursuant thereto.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 26, p. 870; am. 1997, ch. 343, § 1, p. 1027.

§ 23-929. Restriction of sales by licensee. [Repealed.]

§ 23-930. Officers may examine premises.

The director or his duly authorized representative, the sheriff of any county, a constable, or other police officer, shall have the right at any time to make an examination of the premises of any licensee as to whether the laws of the state of Idaho, the rules and regulations of the director, and the ordinances of any city are being complied with and shall also have the right to inspect the cars of any railroad system licensed under this act.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 28, p. 870; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 30, p. 811.

§ 23-931. Advertising prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any licensee to adopt or use any name, sign or advertisement outside of the licensed premises advertising the handling or sale of liquor.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 29, p. 870.

§ 23-932. Director to make regulations — Furnish forms and records.

For the purpose of the administration of this act the director shall make, promulgate and publish such rules and regulations as the said director may deem necessary for carrying out the provisions of this act and for the orderly and efficient administration hereof, and except as may be limited or prohibited by law and the provisions of this act, such rules and regulations so made and promulgated shall have the force of statute. Every licensee shall advise himself of such rules and regulations, and ignorance thereof shall be no defense. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing provisions, the said director shall be empowered and it is made his duty to prescribe forms to be used in the administration of this act, the proof to be furnished and the conditions to be observed in the issuance of licenses, prescribing forms or records to be kept of the sale of liquor by stores, prescribing notices required by this act or the regulations thereof, and the manner of giving and serving the same, prescribing, subject to the provisions of this act, the conditions and qualifications necessary to obtain a license, the books and records to be kept by the licensee, the form of returns to be made by them, and providing for the inspection of such licensed premises, specifying and describing the place and manner in which the liquor may be lawfully kept or stored, covering the conduct, management and equipment of premises licensed to sell liquor and make regulations respecting the sale and consumption of liquor in clubs, hotels and other places of business to licensees.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 30, p. 870; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 31, p. 811.

§ 23-933. Suspension, revocation, and refusal to renew licenses.

The director may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license issued pursuant to the terms of this chapter for any violation of or failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter or rules and regulations promulgated by the director or the state tax commission pursuant to the terms and conditions of this chapter. Procedures for the suspension, revocation, or refusal to grant or renew licenses issued under this chapter shall be in accordance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

When the director determines to suspend such license, the affected licensee may petition the director prior to the effective date of the suspension requesting that a monetary payment be allowed in lieu of the license suspension. If the director determines such payment to be consistent with the purpose of the laws of the state of Idaho and is in the public interest, he shall establish a monetary payment in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). The licensee may reject the payment amount determined by the director, and instead be subject to the suspension provisions of subsection (1) of this section. Upon payment of the amount established, the director shall cancel the suspension period. The director shall cause any payment to be paid to the treasurer of the state of Idaho for credit to the state’s general account in the state operating fund.

The suspension of a license for the sale of beer or wine shall automatically result in the suspension of any license for the sale of liquor held by the same licensee and issued for the same premises or location. Such additional suspension shall be equal in length to and run concurrently with the period of the original suspension.

When a proceeding to revoke or suspend a license has been or is about to be instituted, during the time a renewal application of such license is pending before the director, the director shall renew the license notwithstanding the pending proceedings, but such renewed license may be revoked or suspended without hearing if and when the previous license is, for any reason, revoked or suspended.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-933, as added by 1980, ch. 223, § 2, p. 497; am. 1981, ch. 199, § 1, p. 351; am. 1991, ch. 50, § 1, p. 91; am. 1993, ch. 347, § 1, p. 1290.

§ 23-933A. Licenses — Suspension or revocation for violation of obscenity laws.

In the event of a conviction for a violation of chapter 41, title 18, Idaho Code, relating to obscenity, by any:

licensee,

agent of licensee or

employee or licensee if such licensee knew or should have known in the exercise of reasonable diligence that said employee was violating the provisions of chapter 41, title 18, Idaho Code,

and if the violation committed by any of the above occurred on, or in connection with, premises licensed under this act by such licensee, the director shall suspend the license of such licensee for a period of six (6) months. If such licensee, or his agent or employee, has previously been convicted of a violation of chapter 41, title 18, Idaho Code, relating to obscenity, which violation occurred on, or in connection with, the premises licensed under this act by such licensee, the director shall revoke the license of such licensee.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-933A, as added by 1973, ch. 305, § 19, p. 655; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 33, p. 811.

§ 23-933B. Procedure for other licensing authorities.

The licensing authority of any county or incorporated municipality shall have and exercise the same powers to revoke, suspend, or to refuse grant of renewal of a retailer’s license issued or issuable by it, as are granted to the director in this act. The determination of any such licensing authority to revoke, suspend, or to refuse grant of renewal of any retailer’s license, shall be upon the same grounds referred to in section 23-933, Idaho Code, and may also be upon the grounds that the licensee has violated an ordinance validly enacted by it and regulating, governing or prohibiting the sale, manufacture, transportation or possession of beer or intoxicating liquor and notice thereof shall be given, and proceedings to contest said determination allowed, as provided for in this act with respect to state licenses issued by the director. The order to show cause shall be addressed to the board of county commissioners of the county or to the city council of the incorporated municipality, requiring the commissioners or councilmen, or such representative as they may designate, to appear in response thereto. Service of the order to show cause and petition shall be ordered to be made upon the chairman of the board of county commissioners or mayor or city manager of the municipality, as the case may be.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-933B, as added by 1977, ch. 143, § 4, p. 316.

§ 23-934. Unlicensed rooms unlawful — Exception.

It shall be unlawful for any person to keep or maintain any rooms or premises in which liquor is received or kept, whether owned by such person or by another, or to which liquor is brought, for consumption on the premises by members of the public or of any club, incorporated or unincorporated, or a corporation or association, unless such person and the premises are licensed under this act, except as provided under a liquor catering permit.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-934, as added by 1955, ch. 227, § 1, p. 499; am. 1965, ch. 211, § 1, p. 484.

§ 23-934A. Alcohol beverage catering permit — Application.

An alcohol beverage catering permit is a permit issued pursuant to this section that authorizes the permittee to serve and sell liquor by the drink, beer and wine, or beer, or wine, at a festival or convention, for a time period not to exceed five (5) consecutive days, with an option to request one (1) permit extension on the same terms and conditions as the original permit, which extension may be issued or denied at the sole and absolute discretion of the original issuing entity, or at a party for a time period not to exceed two (2) consecutive days. An alcohol beverage catering permit shall be limited to authorization to sell liquor or beer or wine, or any combination thereof, based upon the type of license the applicant possesses. Applications for such permit shall be made to the city within which the liquor, beer or wine is to be served, or if not within a city then to the county, on such form as prescribed by the city or county which shall contain at a minimum, but not limited to, the following information:

The name and address of the applicant and the number of his state liquor, beer or wine license.

The dates and hours during which the original permit is to be effective, not to exceed five (5) consecutive days.

The names of the organizations, groups, or persons sponsoring the event.

The address at which the liquor, beer or wine is to be served, and if a public building, the rooms in which the liquor, beer or wine is to be served.

The application shall be verified by the applicant and filed with the appropriate governing body or its designee. A filing fee in the amount of twenty dollars ($20.00) for each day the permit is to be effective shall be paid to the treasury of the governing body which shall not be refunded in any event. Any alcohol beverage catering permit shall be valid only within the issuing jurisdiction.

No alcohol beverage catering permit issued pursuant to this section shall be used on a licensed premise. An alcohol beverage catering permit issued pursuant to this section shall only be exercised by the licensee on record.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-934A, as added by 1965, ch. 211, § 2, p. 484; am. 1970, ch. 258, § 1, p. 690; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 34, p. 811; am. 1987, ch. 58, § 1, p. 104; am. 1992, ch. 57, § 1, p. 167; am. 1999, ch. 58, § 2, p. 146; am. 2016, ch. 268, § 2, p. 721.

§ 23-934B. Filing of application — Approval.

Upon the filing of an application for an alcohol beverage catering permit, the city council or its designee, or county commissioners or their designee receiving the application shall, upon the advice and recommendation of the chief of police and chief of fire or sheriff, approve or disapprove the application and indicate the determination on the face of the application by endorsement signed by the clerk of the city or county. The chief of police and chief of fire are, or the sheriff is, authorized to endorse an application for an alcohol beverage catering permit with sufficient conditions to ensure public safety. Copies of the application with signed endorsements thereon shall be mailed, delivered by electronic mail or delivered immediately to the chief of police or sheriff, the director and the applicant, and a signed copy retained by the clerk. An application approved in this manner shall constitute an alcohol beverage catering permit.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-934B, as added by 1965, ch. 211, § 2, p. 484; am. 1970, ch. 258, § 2, p. 690; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 35, p. 811; am. 1987, ch. 58, § 2, p. 104; am. 1992, ch. 57, § 2, p. 167; am. 1999, ch. 58, § 3, p. 146; am. 2016, ch. 268, § 3, p. 721.

§ 23-934C. Regulatory and penalty provisions applicable.

All of the regulatory and penal provisions of title 23, Idaho Code, shall apply to the exercise of alcohol beverage catering permits, including the penalties for violations thereof, except such provisions declared to be inapplicable to alcohol beverage catering permits by rules prescribed by the director of the Idaho state police; provided, however, the director shall have no power to declare inapplicable any of the provisions of section 23-927, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-934C, as added by 1965, ch. 211, § 2, p. 484; am. 1999, ch. 58, § 4, p. 146; am. 2000, ch. 469, § 64, p. 1450.

§ 23-935. Violation — Misdemeanors.

A violation of any of the provisions of this act by any agent, employee, servant, or other person in any way acting in behalf of the licensee shall be presumed to be a violation by the licensee. Any person violating any of the provisions of this act, except where a specific penalty is provided, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not less than the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than the sum of three hundred dollars ($300) or be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months, or both such fine and imprisonment. Any court in which a judgment of conviction against any licensee shall be entered shall forthwith certify a copy thereof to the director and the director shall thereupon give intended notice of revocation of any license to such convicted person.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 32, p. 870; am. 1970, ch. 258, § 3, p. 690; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 36, p. 811.

§ 23-936. Duty of public officers.

It is hereby made the duty of the prosecuting attorneys, sheriffs, and all constables and peace officers of the counties or municipalities knowing of any violation of this act to make complaint before the proper tribunal and perform the duties of their offices with respect to the prosecution and conviction of such offenders. Any such officer knowingly refusing to inform against or prosecute any offender under the provisions of this act shall be subject to action against him as provided in chapter 41, title 19, Idaho Code.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 33, p. 870; am. 1999, ch. 103, § 3, p. 327.

§ 23-937. Violation a moral nuisance.

Any violation of the provisions of this act or any rule or regulation of the director promulgated hereunder shall constitute a moral nuisance under the provisions of section 52-204, Idaho Code.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 34, p. 870; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 37, p. 811.

§ 23-938. Selling liquor without license — Penalty.

Any person who sells or keeps for sale any liquor without a license as provided in this act shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or [nor] more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or be imprisoned in the state prison for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, or both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

1947, ch. 274, § 35, p. 870.